Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1249.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1.1. Title 36, chapter 1, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 36-123.05, to read: START_STATUTE36-123.05. Dementia services program; department duties; Alzheimer's disease state plan; posting; reporting requirement; advisory council; definition A. The department is designated as the lead agency in this state to address Alzheimer's disease and related forms of dementia. B. The director shall establish a dementia services program within the department that does all of the following: 1. Facilitates the coordination of programs that relate to Alzheimer's disease and related forms of dementia in all state agencies. 2. Facilitates the coordination, review, publication and implementation of and updates to the Alzheimer's disease state plan developed pursuant to this section. 3. Applies for public health funding and grants related to Alzheimer's disease and related forms of dementia. 4. Incorporates evidence-based brain health strategies into relevant department-led public health programs. C. The department shall develop an Alzheimer's disease state plan that Assesses the current and future impact of Alzheimer's disease and related forms of dementia on this state and that: 1. Assesses and identifies relevant gaps in all of the following: (a) Existing state services and resources that address the needs of persons living with Alzheimer's disease or a related form of dementia and their caregivers. (b) The needs of persons who have Alzheimer's disease or a related form of dementia and how their lives are affected throughout the progression of the disease. (c) This state's public and private health systems, workforce and clinical capacity and capability to provide effective detection, diagnosis and treatment of Alzheimer's disease and related forms of dementia. (d) This state's public and private nonmedical care and support services for persons living with Alzheimer's disease or a related form of dementia and their caregivers. 2. Provides strategic recommendations with measurable goals for state action to do all of the following for persons living with Alzheimer's disease or a related form of dementia: (a) Improve access to care, support, diagnostics and treatment. (b) Improve the quality of dementia care, including crisis response, health care systems, long-term care and in-home care. (c) Advance risk reduction and early detection awareness and brain health. (d) Improve caregiver support, care planning and care coordination. (e) Improve the collection, availability and use of dementia-related data by state agencies. D. The department shall convene or designate an advisory council or working group to assist in planning, conducting and evaluating stakeholder engagement and state plan implementation, review and updates.  Membership of the advisory council or working group shall reflect the diversity of stakeholders identified in subsection E, paragraph 1 of this section. E. The department shall conduct stakeholder engagement sessions at least once each calendar year to solicit input on the state plan.  The department shall: 1. Seek feedback from and collaborate with persons who have Alzheimer's disease or a related form of dementia, direct caregivers and public, private and nonprofit organizations focused on Alzheimer's care services, research, advocacy, health services and caregiver support. 2. At least thirty days before each engagement session, provide public notice of the session, including the date, time, location or virtual access information, a summary agenda and instructions for submitting written comments. 3. Ensure meaningful participation by stakeholders statewide, including rural and underserved communities, and provide reasonable accommodations and language access. 4. Accept written comments for at least fourteen days following each engagement session. F. On or before September 30, 2027 and at least every third year thereafter, the department shall update and submit the state plan to the governor, the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives and shall provide a copy to the secretary of state.  The department shall publish the plan on the department's public website. G. For the purposes of this section, "caregiver" means an unpaid person who provides regular assistance in activities of daily living for a person living with Alzheimer's disease or a related form of dementia. END_STATUTE Sec. 2.2. Appropriation; department of health services; dementia services program; Alzheimer's disease state plan The sum of $600,000 is appropriated from the health services lottery monies fund established by section 36-108.01, Arizona Revised Statutes, in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of health services for the dementia services program established pursuant to section 36-123.05, Arizona Revised Statutes, as added by this act, and the implementation of the Alzheimer's disease state plan.